Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-545
Commission; enforce act; rules and regulations; violation; penalty; damages; prosecution.

The commission shall enforce the Grain Warehouse Act and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to aid in the administration of the act. Any person or partner, limited liability company member, officer, or agent of any person who violates the Grain Warehouse Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony, unless otherwise specifically provided, and shall be liable for any damages suffered by any person from such violation. Upon request of the commission, the Attorney General or any county attorney shall assist in the prosecution of any violations of the act.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 21;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 565;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 95.